District of Columbia statutes.
2-1329

Staff assistance.

The Commission shall have 1 paid staff person. In addition, the Director of the Office on Latino Affairs shall provide information and technical assistance as required under § 2-1313.

Sept. 29, 1976, D.C. Law 1-86, title IV, § 409, 23 DCR 2543
1981 Ed., § 1-2329.
1973 Ed., § 6-1929.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 809 of the Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 10-253, Mar. 23, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1652).
For temporary repeal of § 809 of D.C. Law 10-253, see § 813 of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
Section 813 of D.C. Law 11-52 repealed § 809 of D.C. Law 10-253.